Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Amendment of Charter

48-20-101. Authority to amend.

A corporation may amend its charter at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the charter or to delete a provision not required in the charter. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the charter is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A shareholder of the corporation does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the charter or bylaws, including provisions relating to management, control, capital structure, dividend entitlement, or purpose or duration of the corporation.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.01; 1987, ch. 273, § 35.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Documents filed with county register of deeds in addition to the secretary of state's office, § 48-11-303.

Nonprofit corporations, amendment of charter and bylaws, title 48, ch. 60.

48-20-102. Amendment by board of directors.

Unless the charter provides otherwise, a corporation's board of directors may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation's charter without shareholder action to:

Delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

Delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the secretary of state;

Designate or change the address of the principal office of the corporation (or a mailing address if the United States postal service does not deliver to the principal office);

Change each issued and unissued authorized share of an outstanding class into a greater number of whole shares if the corporation has only shares of that class outstanding;

Change the corporate name by substituting the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” or “co.,” for a similar word or abbreviation in the name, or by adding, deleting or changing a geographical attribution for the name;

Designate the street address and zip code of the corporation's current registered office (or a mailing address if the United States postal service does not deliver to the registered office), the county in which the office is located, and the name of its current registered agent at that office, as required by § 48-27-101(b);

Delete the initial principal office, if an annual report is on file with the secretary of state; or

Make any other change expressly permitted by chapters 11-27 of this title to be made without shareholder action.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.02; 1987, ch. 273, § 36; 1989, ch. 451, § 13; 1991, ch. 188, § 3; 2012, ch. 1051, §§ 37, 38.

48-20-103. Amendment by board of directors and shareholders.

A corporation's board of directors may propose one (1) or more amendments to the charter for submission to the shareholders.

For the amendment to be adopted:

The board of directors shall recommend the amendment to the shareholders, unless the board of directors determines that because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicate the basis for its determination to the shareholders with the amendment; and

The shareholders entitled to vote on the amendment shall approve the amendment as provided in subsection (e).

The board of directors may condition its submission of the proposed amendment on any basis.

The corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with § 48-17-105. The notice of meeting must also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed amendment and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the amendment.

Unless chapters 11-27 of this title, the charter, or the board of directors (acting pursuant to subsection (c)) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the amendment to be adopted must be approved by:

A majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the amendment by any voting group with respect to which the amendment would create dissenters' rights; and

The votes required by §§ 48-17-206 and 48-17-207 by every other voting group entitled to vote on the amendment.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.03.

48-20-104. Voting on amendments by voting groups.

The holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a separate voting group (if shareholder voting is otherwise required by chapters 11-27 of this title) on a proposed amendment if the amendment would:

Increase or decrease the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification of all or part of the shares of the class into shares of another class;

Effect an exchange or reclassification, or create the right of exchange, of all or part of the shares of another class into shares of the class;

Change the designation, rights, preferences, or limitations of all or part of the shares of the class;

Change the shares of all or part of the class into a different number of shares of the same class;

Create a new class or change a class with subordinate and inferior rights into a class of shares, having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class, or increase the rights, preferences or number of authorized shares of any class having rights or preferences with respect to distributions or to dissolution that are prior, superior, or substantially equal to the shares of the class;

Limit or deny an existing preemptive right of all or part of the shares of the class;

Authorize the issuance as a share dividend of shares of such class in respect of shares of another class; or

Cancel or otherwise affect rights to distributions or dividends that have accumulated but not yet been declared on all or part of the shares of the class.

If a proposed amendment would affect a series of a class of shares in one (1) or more of the ways described in subsection (a), the shares of that series are entitled to vote as a separate voting group on the proposed amendment.

If a proposed amendment that entitles two (2) or more series of shares to vote as separate voting groups under this section would affect those two (2) or more series in the same or a substantially similar way, the shares of all the series so affected must vote together as a single voting group on the proposed amendment.

A class or series of shares is entitled to the voting rights granted by this section although the charter provides that the shares are nonvoting shares.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.04; 1989, ch. 451, § 14.

48-20-105. Amendment before issuance of shares.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares, its board of directors or its incorporators, in the event that there is no board of directors, may adopt one (1) or more amendments to the corporation's charter.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.05.

48-20-106. Articles of amendment.

A corporation amending its charter shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment adopted;

If an amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification or cancellation of issued shares, provisions for implementing such amendment if not contained in the amendment itself;

The date of each amendment's adoption;

If an amendment was duly adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required; and

If an amendment was duly adopted by the shareholders, a statement to that effect.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.06; 1989, ch. 451, § 15; 1991, ch. 188, § 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-703, 5-704, 5-706.

48-20-107. Restated charter.

A corporation's board of directors may restate its charter at any time with or without shareholder action.

The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the charter. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring shareholder approval, it shall be adopted as provided in § 48-20-103.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for shareholder action, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed shareholders' meeting in accordance with § 48-17-105. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the charter.

A corporation restating its charter shall deliver to the secretary of state the restated charter, setting forth the name of the corporation and the text of the restated charter, together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the charter requiring shareholder approval and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the charter requiring shareholder approval, the information required by § 48-20-106.

If the restatement contains an amendment to the charter, it shall be designated in the heading as an “Amended and Restated Charter.”

The restated charter must contain all the requirements of a charter as set out in § 48-12-102(a) unless the corporation is exempt from any of those requirements pursuant to § 48-27-101(b).

A duly adopted restated charter supersedes the original charter and all prior amendments thereto.

The secretary of state may certify a restated charter as the charter currently in effect, without including the certificate information required by subsection (d).

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.07; 1989, ch. 451, § 16; 1991, ch. 188, § 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-702.

48-20-108. Amendment of charter pursuant to reorganization.

A corporation's charter may be amended without action by the board of directors or shareholders to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute, if the charter after amendment contains only provisions required or permitted by § 48-12-102.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

Shareholders of a corporation undergoing reorganization do not have dissenters' rights except as and to the extent provided in the reorganization plan.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceedings, even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.08.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-705.

Law Reviews.

The Conundrum of Directors' Duties in Nearly Insolvent Corporations (Mike Roberts), 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (1993).

48-20-109. Effect of amendment.

An amendment to the charter does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the corporation, a proceeding to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders of the corporation. An amendment changing a corporation's name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the corporation in its former name.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 10.09.